Illinois, session 104th, SB2623.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 529-6.3 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/29-6.3)7    Sec. 29-6.3. Transportation to and from specified 8interscholastic or school-sponsored activities.9    (a) Any school district transporting students in grade 12 10or below for an interscholastic, interscholastic athletic, or 11school-sponsored, noncurriculum-related activity that (i) does 12not require student participation as part of the educational 13services of the district and (ii) is not associated with the 14students' regular class-for-credit schedule or required 5 15clock hours of instruction under Section 10-19.05 shall 16transport the students only in a school bus, a vehicle 17manufactured to transport not more than 10 persons, including 18the driver, or a multifunction school-activity bus 19manufactured to transport not more than 15 persons, including 20the driver.21    (a-5) A student in any of grades 7 9 through 12 may be 22transported in a multifunction school-activity multi-function 23school activity bus (MFSAB) as defined in Section 1-148.3a-5   SB2623- 2 -LRB104 12402 LNS 22669 b1of the Illinois Vehicle Code for any curriculum-related or 2career-related activity except for transportation on regular 3bus routes from home to school or from school to home, subject 4to the following conditions:5        (i) A MFSAB may not be used to transport students 6    under this Section unless the driver holds a valid school 7    bus driver permit.8        (ii) The use of a MFSAB under this Section is subject 9    to the requirements of Sections 6-106.11, 6-106.12, 10    12-707.01, 13-101, and 13-109 of the Illinois Vehicle 11    Code. 12    (b) Any school district furnishing transportation for 13students under the authority of this Section shall insure 14against any loss or liability of the district resulting from 15the maintenance, operation, or use of the vehicle.16    (c) Vehicles used to transport students under this Section 17may claim a depreciation allowance of 20% over 5 years as 18provided in Section 29-5 of this Code.19(Source: P.A. 101-12, eff. 7-1-19.) 20    Section 10. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 21changing Sections 1-148.3a-5 and 11-1414.1 as follows: 22    (625 ILCS 5/1-148.3a-5)23    Sec. 1-148.3a-5. Multifunction school-activity school 24activity bus. A multifunction school-activity bus (MFSAB)   SB2623- 3 -LRB104 12402 LNS 22669 b1means a school bus manufactured for the purpose of 2transporting 11 or more persons, including the driver, whose 3purposes do not include transporting students to and from home 4or school bus stops unless authorized by Article XIV of 5Chapter 11 of this Code or by Section 29-6.3 of the School 6Code. A MFSAB is prohibited from meeting the special 7requirements for school buses in Sections 12-801, 12-803, and 812-805 and subsection (a) of Section 12-802 of this Code.9(Source: P.A. 96-410, eff. 7-1-10; 97-378, eff. 8-15-11.) 10    (625 ILCS 5/11-1414.1)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 11-1414.1)11    Sec. 11-1414.1. School transportation of students. 12    (a) Every student enrolled in grade 12 or below in any 13entity listed in subsection (a) of Section 1-182 of this Code 14must be transported in a school bus or a vehicle described in 15subdivision (1) or (2) of subsection (b) of Section 1-182 of 16this Code for any curriculum-related or career-related school 17activity, except a student in any of grades 9 through 12 or a 18student in any of grades K through 12 with an individualized 19education program Individualized Education Plan (IEP) with a 20staff to student ratio of 1 to 5, and attending Acacia Academy, 21Alexander Leigh, Marklund, Helping Hands Center, Connections 22Organization, Soaring Eagle Academy, or New Horizon Academy 23may be transported in a multifunction school-activity 24multi-function school activity bus (MFSAB) as defined in 25Section 1-148.3a-5 of this Code for any curriculum-related or   SB2623- 4 -LRB104 12402 LNS 22669 b1career-related activity except for transportation on regular 2bus routes from home to school or from school to home, subject 3to the following conditions:4        (i) A MFSAB may not be used to transport students 5    under this Section unless the driver holds a valid school 6    bus driver permit.7        (ii) The use of a MFSAB under this Section is subject 8    to the requirements of Sections 6-106.11, 6-106.12, 9    12-707.01, 13-101, and 13-109 of this Code.10    "Curriculum-related school or career-related activity" as 11used in this subsection (a) includes transportation from home 12to school or from school to home, tripper or shuttle service 13between school attendance centers, transportation to college, 14university, student job site developed through a partnership 15with the school, a vocational or career center or other 16trade-skill development site or a regional safe school or 17other school-sponsored alternative learning program, or an 18experience that the school determines will contribute to the 19college or career readiness of the student or a trip that is 20directly related to the regular curriculum of a student for 21which he or she earns credit, or an experience that the school 22determines will contribute to the college or career readiness 23of the student.24    (b) Every student enrolled in grade 12 or below in any 25entity listed in subsection (a) of Section 1-182 of this Code 26who is transported in a vehicle that is being operated by or   SB2623- 5 -LRB104 12402 LNS 22669 b1for a public or private primary or secondary school, including 2any primary or secondary school operated by a religious 3institution, for an interscholastic, 4interscholastic-athletic, or school-sponsored, 5noncurriculum-related activity that (i) does not require 6student participation as part of the educational services of 7the entity and (ii) is not associated with the students' 8regular class-for-credit schedule shall transport students 9only in a school bus or vehicle described in subsection (b) of 10Section 1-182 of this Code. A student participating in an 11agrarian-related activity may also be transported in a second 12division pick-up truck registered under paragraph 7 of 13subsection (b) of Section 3-808.1. For purposes of this 14subsection, "pick-up truck" means a truck weighing 12,000 15pounds or less with an enclosed cabin that can seat up to 6 16passengers with seatbelts, including the driver, and an open 17cargo area. This subsection (b) does not apply to any second 18division vehicle used by an entity listed in subsection (a) of 19Section 1-182 of this Code for a parade, homecoming, or a 20similar noncurriculum-related school activity.21(Source: P.A. 102-544, eff. 8-20-21.)